ja: スポーク形状: エアロフォイル; ブレード; ラウンド; その他
es: Forma de los radios: Aerodinámico; Plano; Redondo; Otro
bg-BG: Форма на спицата: Аеродинамична; Плоска; Кръгла; Друго
hr-HR: Oblici Shapes: Aeroprofil; Plosnato; Okruglo; Ostalo
zh-TW: 輻條形狀: 翼型; 扁平; 圓形; 其他
en: Spoke shape: Aerofoil; Bladed; Round; Other
pt-PT: Forma do raio: Perfil aerodinâmico; Achatado; Redondo; Outro
de: Form der Speiche: Aeroprofil; Messerspeiche; Rund; Sonstige
th: รูปทรงซี่ล้อ: แอโรฟอยล์; ทรงแบน; ทรงกลม; อื่นๆ
tr: Jant teli kesit şekli: Aerofoil; Yassı; Yuvarlak; Diğer
vi: Hình dạng nan hoa: Cánh gió; Dẹt; Tròn; Khác
pl: Kształt szprych: Aerodynamiczne; Płaskie; Okrągłe; Inne
cs: Tvar drátu/paprsku kola: Aerodynamický; Plochý; Kulatý; Jiné
ro-RO: Forma spiței: Aerofoil; Lame; Rotund; Altele
el: Σχήμα ακτίνας: Αεροδυναμικό; Πεπλατυσμένο; Στρογγυλό; Άλλο
pt-BR: Formato do raio: Aerofólio; Achatado; Redondo; Outro
sl-SI: Oblika naper: Aeroprofil; Ploščata oblika; Okrogla oblika; Drugo
hu: Küllőforma: Szárnyprofil; Lapított; Kerek; Egyéb
fr: Forme du rayon: Profilé aérodynamique; Plat; Rond; Autre
nb: Eikeform: Aeroprofil; Flatt; Rundt; Annet
zh-CN: 辐条形状: 气动翼型; 扁形; 圆形; 其他
ko: 스포크 모양: 에어로포일; 블레이드; 라운드; 기타
fi: Pinnan muoto: Aerodynaaminen; Litteä; Pyöreä; Muu
it: Forma dei raggi: Profilo aerodinamico; Piatto; Tondo; Altro
da: Egerform: Aero; Flad; Rund; Andet
sk-SK: Tvary špíc: Aerodynamické; Ploché; Okrúhle; Iné
sv: Ekerform: Aeroprofil; Bladformad; Rund; Övrigt
ru: Форма спицы: Аэродинамическая; Плоская; Круглая; Другая
lt-LT: Stipino forma: Aerodinaminis profilis; Plokščias; Apvalus; Kita
nl: Spaak vorm: Aerofoil; Plat; Rond; Overige